Utah statutes.
58-56-9.1.   Unlawful conduct.
Unlawful conduct is as defined in Subsection 58-1-501(1) and includes:
(1)  engaging in the sale of factory built housing without being registered
with the division as a dealer, unless the sale is exempt under Section
58-56-16;
(2)  selling factory built housing within the state as a dealer without
collecting and remitting to the division the fee required by Section 58-56-17;
(3)  acting as a building inspector or representing oneself to be acting as a
building inspector, unless licensed or exempted from licensure under this
chapter or using the title building inspector or any other description, words,
letters, or abbreviation indicating that the person is a building inspector if
the person has not been licensed under this chapter;
(4)  acting as a building inspector beyond the scope of the license held under
this chapter; and
(5)  hiring or employing in any manner an unlicensed person as a building
inspector, unless exempted from licensure under this chapter.
